Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 13.1-809.
Certificate of good standing.

Anyone may apply to the Commission to furnish a certificate of good standing for a domestic or foreign corporation.

The certificate of good standing shall state that the corporation is in good standing in the Commonwealth and shall set forth:

The domestic corporation’s corporate name or the foreign corporation’s corporate name and, if applicable, the designated name adopted for use in the Commonwealth;

That (i) the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of the Commonwealth, the date of its incorporation, which is the original date of incorporation or formation of the domesticated or converted corporation if the corporation was domesticated from a foreign jurisdiction or was converted from a domestic eligible entity, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual or (ii) the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth; and

If requested, a list of all certificates relating to articles filed with the Commission that have been issued by the Commission with respect to such corporation and their respective effective dates.

A domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall be deemed to be in good standing if:

All fees, fines, penalties, and interest assessed, imposed, charged, or to be collected by the Commission pursuant to this chapter have been paid;

An annual report required by §

13.1-936

has been delivered to and accepted by the Commission; and

No certificate of dissolution, certificate of withdrawal, or order of reinstatement prohibiting the domestic corporation from engaging in business until it changes its corporate name has been issued or such certificate or prohibition has not become effective or no longer is in effect.

The certificate may state any other facts of record in the office of the clerk of the Commission that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of good standing issued by the Commission may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in good standing in the Commonwealth.

History.

1985, c. 522; 1988, c. 405; 1993, c. 60; 2006, c. 663; 2007, c. 925; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 663, in subdivision C 3, inserted “or order of reinstatement prohibiting the domestic corporation from engaging in business until it changes its corporate name” and made a related change and inserted “or prohibition.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; substituted “to furnish” for “for” following “Commission” in subsection A; substituted “law of the Commonwealth” for “laws of this Commonwealth” in subdivision B 2; and substituted “Act” for “chapter or Title 12.1” in subdivision C 1.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “of good standing” in subsection B; substituted “and, if applicable, the designated name adopted for use” for “used” in subdivision B 1; inserted “which is the original date of incorporation or formation of the domesticated or converted corporation if the corporation was domesticated from a foreign jurisdiction or was converted from a domestic eligible entity” in subdivision B 2; substituted “chapter” for “Act” in subdivision C 1; inserted “has not become effective or” in subdivision C 3; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-810.
Notices and other communications.

For purposes of this chapter, except for notice to or from the Commission:

Notice shall be in writing except that oral notice of any meeting of the board of directors may be given if expressly authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, words in a notice or other communication shall be in the English language. A notice or other communication may be given or sent by any method of delivery except that an electronic transmission shall be in accordance with this section. If these methods of delivery are impracticable, a notice or other communication may be communicated by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the area where the notice is intended to be given, or by radio, television, or other form of public communication in the area where notice is intended to be given.

Notice or other communication to a domestic or foreign corporation, authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, may be delivered to its registered agent at its registered office or to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report or, in the case of a foreign corporation that has not yet delivered an annual report, in its application for a certificate of authority.

Notice or other communication may be delivered by electronic transmission if consented to by the recipient or if authorized by subsection K.

Any consent under subsection D may be revoked by the person who consented by written or electronic notice to the person to whom the consent was delivered. Any such consent is deemed revoked if (i) the corporation is unable to deliver two consecutive electronic transmissions given by the corporation in accordance with such consent and (ii) such inability becomes known to the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation or other person responsible for the giving of notice or other communications. The inadvertent failure to treat such inability as a revocation shall not invalidate any meeting or other action.

Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic transmission is received when:

It enters an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic transmissions or information of the type sent, and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic transmission; and

It is in a form capable of being processed by that system.

Receipt of an electronic acknowledgment from an information processing system described in subdivision F 1 establishes that an electronic transmission was received. However, such receipt of an electronic acknowledgment, by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

An electronic transmission is received under this section even if no individual is aware of its receipt.

Notice or other communication, if in a comprehensible form or manner, is effective at the earliest of the following:

If in physical form, the earliest of when it is actually received or when it is left at:

A member’s address shown on the corporation’s record of members maintained by the corporation pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-932

;

A director’s residence or usual place of business;

The corporation’s principal place of business; or

The corporation’s registered office when left with the corporation’s registered agent;

If mailed postage prepaid and correctly addressed to a member, upon deposit in the United States mail;

If mailed by United States mail postage prepaid and correctly addressed to a recipient other than a member, the earliest of when it is actually received or: (i) if sent by registered or certified mail return receipt requested, the date shown on the receipt, signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or (ii) five days after it is deposited in the mail;

If an electronic transmission, when it is received as provided in subsection F; and

If oral, when communicated.

A notice or other communication may be in the form of an electronic transmission that cannot be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice only if (i) the electronic transmission is otherwise retrievable in perceivable form and (ii) the sender and the recipient have consented in writing to the use of such form of electronic transmission.

If this chapter prescribes requirements for notices or other communications in particular circumstances, those requirements govern. If articles of incorporation or bylaws prescribe requirements for notices or other communications not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of this chapter, those requirements govern. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may authorize or require delivery of notices of meetings of directors by electronic transmission.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925; 2010, c. 171.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “Act, except for notice to or from the Commission” for “chapter” in the introductory paragraph; in subsection B, rewrote the first sentence and added the language beginning “in the area” at the end of the last sentence; in subsection C, substituted “(i) upon deposit in the United States mail” for ‘’when mailed,” added clause (ii) and made a related change; in subsection D, deleted “corporation” following “domestic” and substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth”; substituted “subsection C” for “subsections B and C of this section” in the introductory paragraph of subsection E; deleted “as evidenced by the postmark” following “United States mail” in subdivision E 2; substituted “is effective” for “becomes effective” in subsections E and F; in subsection G, substituted “When this Act” for “If this chapter” in the first sentence and “Act” for “chapter” in the last sentence; and added subsection H.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 171 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-810.1.
Number of members.

For purposes of this Act, the following identified as a member in a corporation’s current record of members constitutes one member:

Two or more persons who together have a single membership interest in the corporation;

A corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, business trust, trust, estate, or other entity; or

The trustees, guardians, custodians, or other fiduciaries of a single trust, estate, or account.

For purposes of this Act, membership interests registered in substantially similar names constitute one member if it is reasonable to believe that the names represent the same person.

History.

2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 623.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 substituted “persons who together have a single membership interest in the corporation” for “co-owners” in subdivision A 1.

§ 13.1-811.
Penalty for signing false documents.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sign a document which he knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Commission for filing.

Anyone who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-295; 1958, c. 506; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 divided the former provisions into present subsections A and B by substituting “Anyone” for “Any person” at the beginning of subsection B.

§ 13.1-812.
Unlawful to transact or offer to transact business as a corporation unless authorized.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transact business in the Commonwealth as a corporation or to offer or advertise to transact business in the Commonwealth as a corporation unless the alleged corporation is either a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-296; 1958, c. 565; 1981, c. 320; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925, in the first sentence, deleted “firm or association” following “person” and substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” twice, “domestic corporation” for “Virginia corporation” and “the Commonwealth” for “Virginia” and deleted “individually or as a member of a firm or association” preceding “violates” in the last sentence.

§ 13.1-813.
Hearing and finality of Commission action; injunctions.

The Commission shall have no power to grant a hearing with respect to any certificate issued by the Commission with respect to any articles filed with the Commission except on a petition by a member or director, filed with the Commission and the corporation within 30 days after the effective date of the certificate, in which the member or director asserts that the certification of corporate action contained in the articles contains a misstatement of a material fact as to compliance with statutory requirements, specifying the particulars thereof. After hearing, on notice in writing to the corporation and the member or director, the Commission shall determine the issues and revoke or refuse to revoke its order accordingly.

No court within or without the Commonwealth shall have jurisdiction to enjoin or delay the holding of any meeting of directors or members for the purpose of authorizing or consummating any amendment, merger, domestication, or termination of corporate existence, or the execution or filing with the Commission of any articles or other documents for such purpose, except pursuant to subsection D of §

13.1-845

or for fraud. No court within or without the Commonwealth, except the Supreme Court by way of appeal as authorized by law, shall have jurisdiction to review, reverse, correct or annul any action of the Commission, within the scope of its authority, with regard to any articles, certificate, order, objection or petition, or to suspend or delay the execution or operation thereof, or to enjoin, restrain or interfere with the Commission in the performance of its official duties.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection A to the contrary, the Commission shall have the power to act upon a petition filed by a corporation at any time to correct Commission records so as to eliminate the effects of clerical errors and of filings made by a person or persons without authority to act for the corporation, or of its own motion to correct Commission records so as to eliminate the effects of clerical errors committed by its staff.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-287; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925; 2008, c. 91; 2010, c. 171; 2015, c. 623.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 added the A and B designations at the beginning of the first and last paragraphs; in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “hearing” for “rehearing” near the beginning and made a minor stylistic change; and in subsection B, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “Virginia” twice and “domestication, or termination of corporate existence” for “or dissolution” and inserted “pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-845

or” preceding “for fraud.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 substituted “30 days” for “10 days” in the first sentence of subsection A; and added subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 171 substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 inserted “or of its own motion to correct Commission records so as to eliminate the effects of clerical errors committed by its staff” in subsection C.

§ 13.1-814.
Shares of stock and dividends prohibited.

A corporation shall not issue shares of stock. No dividend shall be paid and no part of the income of a corporation shall be distributed to its members, directors or officers, except that a corporation may make distributions to another nonprofit corporation that is a member of such corporation or has the power to appoint one or more of its directors. A corporation may pay compensation in a reasonable amount to its members, directors or officers for services rendered, including pensions, may confer benefits upon its members in conformity with its purposes, and may make distributions to its members or others as permitted by this Act upon dissolution or final liquidation and no such payment, benefit or distribution shall be deemed to be a dividend or a distribution of income.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-229; 1956, c. 428; 1985, cc. 380, 522.

§ 13.1-814.1.
Special provisions for community associations.

As used in this section, “community association” shall mean a corporation incorporated under this chapter or under former Chapter 2 of this title which owns or has under its care, custody or control real estate subject to a recorded declaration of covenants which obligates a person, by virtue of ownership of specific real estate, to be a member of the corporation.

Notwithstanding the requirements of §§

13.1-851

,

13.1-852

,

13.1-855

,

13.1-856

,

13.1-857

,

13.1-858

and

13.1-862

, the provisions set forth in those sections need not be set forth in the articles of incorporation of a community association and shall be effective if set forth in the bylaws.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

13.1-855

,

13.1-856

,

13.1-892

and

13.1-899

, the provisions of the bylaws of any community association in existence on or before January 1, 1986, shall continue to govern (i) the procedures for and election of members of the board of directors, (ii) the amendment of the bylaws, (iii) the sale, release, exchange or disposition of all or substantially all of the corporation’s property, whether or not in the usual and regular course of business, and (iv) the corporation’s ability to mortgage, pledge, or dedicate to repayment of indebtedness, or otherwise encumber its property; provided, that the community association may, in accordance with its current articles of incorporation and bylaws, vote to amend its corporate documents to become subject to §§

13.1-855

,

13.1-856

,

13.1-892

and

13.1-899

.

History.

1986, c. 532.